Hawaii statutes.
[§350B-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Advisory committee" means the
component of the Hawaii children's trust fund coalition that serves in an
advisory capacity to the trust fund and the department of health.

"Board" means the Hawaii children's
trust fund advisory board.

"Child abuse and neglect" has the
same meaning as "child abuse or neglect" as defined in section 350-1.

"Coalition" means the Hawaii
children's trust fund coalition.

"Primary prevention" means efforts
targeting the general population designed to promote the general welfare of
children and families prior to any occurrence of abuse or neglect.

"Secondary prevention" means efforts
targeting children and families that are considered, because of their life
situations, to be at risk of abuse or neglect.

"Trust fund" or "fund"
means the Hawaii children's trust fund. [L 1993, c 336, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next